Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201179-1015.01
Local system
formula resources; local effort rate yield; determination.

(1) Local system formula resources shall include local effort rate
yield which shall be computed as prescribed in this section.

(2) For each school fiscal
year except school fiscal years 2011-12 and
2012-13: (a) For state aid certified pursuant to section 79-1022,
the local effort rate shall be the maximum levy, for the school fiscal year
for which aid is being certified, authorized pursuant to subdivision (2)(a)
of section 77-3442 less five cents; (b) for the final calculation of state
aid pursuant to section 79-1065, the local effort rate shall be the rate which,
when multiplied by the total adjusted valuation of all taxable property in
local systems receiving equalization aid pursuant to the Tax Equity and Educational
Opportunities Support Act, will produce the amount needed to support the total
formula need of such local systems when added to state aid appropriated by
the Legislature and other actual receipts of local systems described in section
79-1018.01; and (c) the local effort rate yield for such school fiscal years
shall be determined by multiplying each local system's total adjusted valuation
by the local effort rate.

(3) For school
fiscal years 2011-12 and 2012-13: (a) For state aid certified pursuant to
section 79-1022, the local effort rate shall be the maximum levy, for the
school fiscal year for which aid is being certified, authorized pursuant to
subdivision (2)(a) of section 77-3442 less one and five-hundredths of one
cent; (b) for the final calculation of state aid pursuant to section 79-1065,
the local effort rate shall be the rate which, when multiplied by the total
adjusted valuation of all taxable property in local systems receiving equalization
aid pursuant to the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act,
will produce the amount needed to support the total formula need of such local
systems when added to state aid appropriated by the Legislature and other
actual receipts of local systems described in section 79-1018.01; and (c)
the local effort rate yield for such school fiscal years shall be determined
by multiplying each local system's total adjusted valuation by the local effort
rate.

Laws 1997, LB 806, § 45;

Laws 1998, Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 23;

Laws 1999, LB 149, § 8;

Laws 2001, LB 797, § 24;

Laws 2007, LB641, § 27;

Laws 2008, LB988, § 38;

Laws 2011, LB235, § 16.
April 27, 2011